Utah statutes.
75-5-303.   Procedure for court appointment of a guardian of an incapacitated person.

(1)  The incapacitated person or any person interested in the incapacitated person's welfare may petition for a finding of incapacity and appointment of a guardian.

(2)  Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall set a date for hearing on the issues of incapacity; and unless the allegedly incapacitated person has counsel of the person's own choice, it shall appoint an attorney to represent the person in the proceeding the cost of which shall be paid by the person alleged to be incapacitated, unless the court determines that the petition is without merit, in which case the attorney fees and court costs shall be paid by the person filing the petition.

(3)  The person alleged to be incapacitated may be examined by a physician appointed by the court who shall submit a report in writing to the court and may be interviewed by a visitor sent by the court.  The visitor also may interview the person seeking appointment as guardian, visit the present place of abode of the person alleged to be incapacitated and the place it is proposed that the person will be detained or reside if the requested appointment is made, and submit a report in writing to the court.

(4)  The person alleged to be incapacitated shall be present at the hearing in person and see or hear all evidence bearing upon the person's condition.   If the person seeking the guardianship requests a waiver of presence of the person alleged to be incapacitated, the court shall order an investigation by a court visitor, the costs of which shall be paid by the person seeking the guardianship.  The investigation by a court visitor is not required if there is clear and convincing evidence from a physician that the person alleged to be incapacitated suffers from: (a) fourth stage Alzheimer's Disease; (b) extended comatosis; or (c) profound mental retardation.  The person alleged to be incapacitated is entitled to be represented by counsel, to present evidence, to cross-examine witnesses, including the court-appointed physician and the visitor, and to trial by jury.  The issue may be determined at a closed hearing without a jury if the person alleged to be incapacitated or the person's counsel so requests.

